District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.06

Authority of Council.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or any rule of law, nothing in this unit shall be construed as limiting the authority of the Council to enact any act or resolution, after January 2, 1975, pursuant to the District of Columbia Home Rule Act with respect to any matter covered by this unit.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 406
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2934

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1536.
1973 Ed., § 31-1736.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 301(f) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-264, April 26, 1996, 43 DCR 2412), and.

References in Text

“The District of Columbia Home Rule Act,” referred to near the end of the section, is the Act of December 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, which is codified at Chapter 2 of Title 1, D.C. Official Code.